Arkansas, session 2025, HB1789.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative Findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Arkansas is not a sanctuary state;
(2) Across the country municipal identification card programs
have been considered a component of a sanctuary city policy when the program
allows a local government to provide an official form of government
identification to illegal aliens; and
(3) The State of Arkansas issues state identification cards to
eligible Arkansas residents for identification purposes.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 14, Chapter 1, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
14-1-111. Funding for identification cards — Restrictions —
Definitions.
*SSS231*
03/13/2025 8:04:37 AM SSS231

HB1789
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Identification card" means an identification card
administered and distributed by a local government that:
(A) Provides residents with access to:
(i) Local services;
(ii) Cultural events; or
(iii) Business activities; or
(B) Helps residents identify themselves to:
(i) Law enforcement;
(ii) Schools;
(iii) Banks;
(iv) Health centers; or
(v) Local government departments; and
(2) "Local government" means:
(A) A county;
(B) A city of the first class;
(C) A city of the second class; or
(D) An incorporated town.
(b) A local government shall not:
(1) Issue an identification card to an individual who does not
provide proof of lawful presence in the United States; or
(2) Provide funds to a person, entity, or organization for the
purpose of issuing an identification card to an individual who does not
provide proof of lawful presence in the United States.












03/13/2025 8:04:37 AM SSS231